California, session 20252026, SB698.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The heading of Chapter 8.8 (commencing with Section 25780) of Division 15 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read: CHAPTER 8.8. California Solar Initiative and Equipment ListsSEC. 2. Section 25780 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:25780. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) It is the goal of the state to install solar energy systems with a generation capacity equivalent of 3,000 megawatts, to establish a self-sufficient solar industry in which solar energy systems are a viable mainstream option for both homes and businesses in 10 years, and to place solar energy systems on 50 percent of new homes in 13 years.(b) A solar initiative should be a cost-effective investment by ratepayers in peak electricity generation capacity where ratepayers recoup the cost of their investment through lower rates as a result of avoiding purchases of electricity at peak rates, with additional system reliability and pollution reduction benefits.(c) Creating and maintaining distributed energy resource equipment lists for equipment, components, and systems that further the energy and environmental goals of the state is economically and environmentally beneficial to the state.SEC. 3. Section 25781 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:25781. As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:(a) “Bidirectional charging system” means technology that enables a plug-in electric vehicle to be charged by either the electrical grid or an onsite energy resource and to discharge the energy stored in the onboard battery to buildings, including a home, or to the distribution grid. electric vehicle service equipment” has the same meaning as defined in Section 44269 of the Health and Safety Code.(b) “California Solar Initiative” means the program providing ratepayer funded incentives for eligible solar energy systems adopted by the Public Utilities Commission in Decision 06-01-024.(c) “Distributed energy storage system” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2838.2 of the Public Utilities Code.(c)(d) “Electric vehicle supply equipment” means equipment that enables a plug-in electric vehicle to absorb energy from the distribution grid to charge the onboard battery of the plug-in electric vehicle. service equipment” has the same meaning as defined in Section 44268 of the Health and Safety Code.(d)“Energy storage system” means a technology that is capable of storing electricity that is generated from a co-located generator or from the distribution grid for a period of time before discharging it to meet the energy needs of the host customer site or back to the distribution grid.(e) “kW” means kilowatts or 1,000 watts, as measured from the alternating current side of the solar energy system inverter consistent with Section 223 of Title 15 of the United States Code.(f) “kWh” means kilowatthours, as measured by the number of kilowatts generated in an hour.(g) “MW” means megawatts or 1,000,000 watts.(h) “Solar energy system” means a solar energy device that has the primary purpose of providing for the collection and distribution of solar energy for the generation of electricity, that produces at least one kW, and not more than five MW, alternating current rated peak electricity, and that meets or exceeds the eligibility criteria established pursuant to Section 25782.SEC. 4. Section 25784 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:25784. The commission shall adopt guidelines for solar energy systems receiving ratepayer funded incentives and for distributed energy resource equipment lists at a publicly noticed meeting offering all interested parties an opportunity to comment. Not less than 30 days’ public notice shall be given of the meeting required by this section, before the commission initially adopts guidelines. Substantive changes to the guidelines shall not be adopted without at least 10 days’ written notice to the public. Notwithstanding any other law, guidelines adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 5. Section 25785 is added to the Public Resources Code, immediately following Section 25784, to read:25785. (a)The commission may establish distributed energy resource equipment lists with rating standards for equipment, components, and systems that further state energy and environmental goals, including, but not limited to, for solar energy systems, energy storage systems, bidirectional charging systems, and electric vehicle supply equipment. equipment and components for solar energy systems, distributed energy storage systems, and electric vehicle service equipment, including, but not limited to, bidirectional electric vehicle service equipment.(b)This section does not affect the requirements on the commission pursuant to Section 25783.